Georgia, session 2025_26, HB750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to create the State Court of Forsyth County, approved April 15, 1996 (Ga. L. 1996,
p. 4558), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May 1, 2002 (Ga. L. 2002, p. 5579),
is amended by revising subsection (a) of and adding new subsections to Section 3 to read as
follows:
"(a) Effective July 1, 2026, there shall be three judges of the State Court of Forsyth County
who shall be selected as provided in this section."
"(e) The third judge of the State Court of Forsyth County shall be appointed by the
Governor for an initial term of office beginning on July 1, 2026, and continuing through
December 31, 2028, and until his or her successor is elected and qualified. All future
- 1 -

LC 61 0261S
successors to said judge shall be elected by the qualified voters of Forsyth County at a
nonpartisan election to be held and conducted jointly with the general primary in 2028 and
quadrennially thereafter pursuant to Code Section 21-2-138 of the O.C.G.A. The judge
thus elected shall serve a four-year term and until his or her successor is elected and
qualified.
(f)(1) There is hereby created the position of chief judge of the State Court of Forsyth
County. The chief judge shall be the judge who has served the longest continuous period
of time in office as a judge of said court.
(2) The duties of the chief judge shall include:
(A) Regularly meeting with all judges of the court to discuss issues affecting the
courts, to collaborate on best practices regarding case management and sentencing, and
to improve operational efficiencies;
(B) In consultation with the chief judge of the Superior Court of Forsyth County,
managing the available courtroom space, including any courtrooms in ancillary
facilities, in order to maximize secure courtrooms for criminal trials and other criminal
proceedings, including assigning judges to a particular courtroom on a permanent or
temporary basis;
(C) In consultation with the chief judge of the Superior Court of Forsyth County,
annually identifying present and projected courtroom and administrative space and
other facility needs to the Forsyth County Board of Commissioners after consultation
with all of the judges of the court;
(D) Working with the court administrator, the county manager of Forsyth County, the
local governing authorities, and the Forsyth County Board of Commissioners to
eliminate duplication of functions and achieve greater operational efficiencies;
(E) Preparing and presenting the court's budget to state and local authorities after
conferring with all of the judges of the court;
- 2 -

LC 61 0261S
(F) After consulting with all of the judges of the court, establishing criteria and
qualifications for the employment, discipline, and dismissal of employees assigned to
the courts and each judge;
(G) Devising and implementing a personnel system that ensures fair and lawful
treatment of all court personnel, including judicial staff, while preserving the authority
of each judge to manage and direct his or her selected employees in accordance with
applicable guidelines;
(H) Managing assignments for visiting state court judges; and
(I) Performing all other duties required by law or that are necessary or convenient for
performing the duties set forth in this subsection.
(3) The chief judge shall be permitted to obtain assistance from the other judges of the
court and from judicial staff to perform the duties set forth in this subsection."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 3 -